Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.290

Organ transport services.

(1) An organ transport service may not operate in the state of Washington without holding a license for such operation, issued by the secretary in consultation with the department of licensing.

(2) Organ transport services must ensure that personnel operating organ transport vehicles:

(a) Are at least 25 years of age;

(b) Are a current, previous, or retired police officer, firefighter, or EMS provider;

(c) Have a minimum of five years' experience operating a police, fire department, or emergency medical service vehicle under emergency conditions;

(d) Have passed a preemployment driver's license check showing no more than one moving vehicle violation in a rolling three-year period, with annual license reviews thereafter;

(e) Have passed a preemployment drug screen, with random drug screenings thereafter;

(f) Have passed state and national criminal background checks; and

(g) Have completed an emergency vehicle operators course and a defensive drivers course.

(3) An organ transport service shall maintain:

(a) Commercial general liability insurance in the amount of $5,000,000/$10,000,000 aggregate;

(b) Automobile liability insurance in the amount of $5,000,000; and

(c) An umbrella policy in the amount of $2,000,000.

(4) The license shall be valid for a period of two years and shall be renewed on request provided the holder has consistently complied with the regulations of the department and the department of licensing and provided also that the needs of the area served have been met satisfactorily. The license shall not be transferable and may be revoked if the service is found in violation of rules adopted by the department.

(5) The department, in consultation with the department of licensing, shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement this section.

(6) Employment as a driver for organ transport vehicles does not add to the scope of practice for a current EMS provider and is not considered employment as an EMS provider.

(7) The secretary shall not establish fees for the license and renewals for an organ transport service or vehicle.

[ 2023 c 290 s 12.]